Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2384.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Subject to the provisions of this section, the state
historical society, for and on behalf of the state of Kansas, is hereby
authorized to convey to the Shawnee Tribe all of the rights, title and
interest in the following described real estate, and any improvements
thereon, located in Johnson county, Kansas, containing 11.97 acres more
or less:
A part of the Southwest quarter of Section 3 Township 12 Range 25,
Beginning at the Northwest corner of the Southeast 1/4 of the Southwest
1/4, then North 475.4 feet then East 472.85 feet, then Southeasterly
1024.37 feet, the West 548.27 feet, then North 545.5 feet to the point of
beginning, approximately 11.97 acres.
(b) Conveyance of such rights, title and interest in such real estate,
and any improvements thereon, shall be executed in the name of the state
historical society by the executive director of the state historical society by
quitclaim deed without the necessity of appraisal, bid or publication and
shall not be subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3043a, and amendments
thereto. No exchange and conveyance of real estate, and any
improvements thereon, as authorized by this section shall be made by the
executive director until the deeds and conveyances have been reviewed
and approved by the attorney general. Such deeds and conveyances shall
contain restrictive covenants prohibiting any gaming or gambling activities
on the land and improvements described in subsection (a).
(c) The Shawnee Tribe agrees to pay all costs related to the
conveyance and shall grant the state a historic preservation easement that
will reflect current federal preservation laws regarding properties listed as
national historic landmarks. The Shawnee Tribe further agrees that such

HB 2384 2
land described in subsection (a) and any land adjacent to or near such land
shall not be used as a casino or other gaming facility.
(d) The Shawnee Tribe shall engage in formal consultations with the
four federally recognized tribes and any other federally recognized tribe
that had children who attended the Shawnee Indian Manual Labor School
concerning rehabilitation of the land and structures described in subsection
(a).
(e) The Shawnee Tribe shall provide an update on its work to
rehabilitate and manage the property described in subsection (a) and its
consultation efforts every two years for a 10-year period to the joint
committee on state-tribal relations.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.